DI-42

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:

When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:

e UsingSST09843 -180200r09843 -18040,connecttheterminals TcandE
and CG of DLC3.

. Ifany abnormality is notfound wheninspecting parts, inspectthe ECU.

. Ifamalfunction codeis displayed duringthe DTC check, check the circuitlisted that code. For details
of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the DTC

DI6X1-03

] ofcheckconnctororTc

chart.
DTC chart of ABS:
DTC No. .
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
co0278/ 11 L . -
Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
() * ABS salenaidrela.
C0279/12 * ABS solenoidrelay circuit
(1) B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0226/21 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (SFLcircuit) ¢ SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (SRRcircuit) * SRRR or SRRH circuit
C0256/24 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SRLcircuit) *SRLRor SRLH circuit
C1225/25 Open orshortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SA1 circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (SA2circuit) ¢ SA2circuit
C1227/27 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster * Hydraulic brake booster
() solenoid circuit (SA3 circuit) * SA3circuit
C1228/28 Openor shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (STRcircuit) * STRcircuit
1
C0200/31* . . .
(1) Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
1
C0205/32* . .
(1) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction « Right front, leftfront, right rear and left rear speed sensor
T * Each speed'sensorcircuit -
C0210/33* . . . S
(1) Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Sensorrotor
1
C0215/34* . .
(1) Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction
C1237/37 L . ) N
(1) Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size
. * Battery
C1241/41 Low battery voltage or abnormally high battery I lat
*|Cregulator
() positive voltage 9 -
* Power source circuit
2 *Batt
C1242/42* N - ey
(1) Open circuit in 1G2 circuit «ICregulator
» Power source circuit
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C1243/43 L . ¢ Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) j )
() *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244 /44 o . o * Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit . L
() » Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/ 45 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor ) .
() *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1246 / 46 L . * Master cylinder pressure sensor
Malfunction in master cylinder pressure sensor ) -
(DI-50) * Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit
C1249/49 « Stop light bulb

(7))

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit

« Stop light switch circuit

2
C1251/51%
()

Pump motor is locked
Open circuit in pump motor ground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2
C1252/ 52*
()

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)

2
C1253/53*
(0)

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

* ABS motor1 or ABS motor2 relay
* ABS motor1 or ABS motor2 relay circuit
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

C1254/ 54+
(9)

Pressure switch malfunction

* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
¢ Pressure switch circuit

2
C1256 / 56*
()

Accumulator low pressure malfunction

* Accumulator
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2
C1257 / 57*
(o)

Power supply drive circuit malfunction

 Battery
¢ Power source circuit
*ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU

C1268/ 68
(9)

Transfer L4 position signal transmission failure

* Transfer L4 position switch
* Transfer L4 position switch circuit

C1269/69
(0)

Malfunction in PNP switch circuit (R position)

* PNP switch
* PNP switch circuit (R position)

Always ON
()

Malfunction in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU

* Battery

«ICregulator

* Power source circuit
*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

0: Reft?r LAND CRUISER Chassis and Body Repair Manual (Pub. No. RM731E).

« *:AstheDTC cannotbe erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.
(1) Clear the DTC (See page DI-31).
(g) At the venhicle speed of 20 km/h (12 mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. or more.

e  *:Using the following table, troubled parts can be specified.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
Table of Trouble Part and DTC:
DTC C1242/42 | C1251/51 | C1252/52 | C1253/53 | C1254/54 | C1256/56 | C1257/57
BRAKE Warning ||ght andbuzzer Light Buzzer LightBuzzer| LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LightBuzzer LighBuzzer|
O O O O
Pressure switch PH
PL 0 0 0 O
Pump motor e e oo
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness
MT+ wire harness 0
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit 0
o MR2 open circuit -
Motor relay circuit 0l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulicbrake booster| Pressureleaks oo u | o
Power source* IG2 open circuit O
ECU Power supply circuit 0

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
DTC chart of VSC:
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
C1231/ 31 L . « Steering angle sensor
Malfunction in steering angle sensor . —
() « Steering angle sensor circuit
C1232/32 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . N
(o) « Deceleration sensor circuit
C1233/33 o o * Yaw rate sensor
Open or short circuit in yaw rate sensor circuit o
()  Yawrate sensor circuit
C1234 /34 L *Yawrate sensor
Malfunction in yaw rate sensor .
()  Yaw rate sensor circuit
C1210/ 36 . o * Yawrate sensor o
(1) Zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor undone *Yaw rate sensor circuit
¢ PNP switch circuit (P position)
C1207/37 Malfunction in PNP switch (P/R i * PNP switch
nction in n
(1) aftunction| switch (P/R position) « PNP switch circuit (P/R position)
* Decelerationsensor
C1336/39 . N ) I .
(1) Zero point calibration of deceleration sensor undone * Deceleration sensor circuit
* PNP switch (P position) circuit
C1223 /43 .
(1) Malfunction in ABS control system ABS control system
*NEOcircuit
C1224/ 44 o o etred!
(1) Open or short circuit in NE signal circuit *ECM
*ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU
C1340/ 47 o . . . « Center differential lock system
Open circuit in center differential lock signal . ) Lo
(0) « Center differential lock circuit
C1201/ 51 ) ) .
(1) Engine and ECT ECU system malfunction Engine control system
C1203 /53 . R . *TRC+orTRC —circ.uit .
(1) Engine and ECT ECU communication circuit malfunction *ENG+0rENG - circuit
*EngineandECTECU
Always ON Malfunctionin ABS & BA& TRC & VSCECU » Power source circuit
() Open circuitin VSC TRC warning light circuit «VSC TRCwarninglightcircuit

1: Refer LAND CRUISER Chassis and Body Repair Manual (Pub. No. RM731E).

HINT:

Thereisacasethathand
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-heldtester cannotbe used when VSC TRC warning lightis always on.




